src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON zl34_8 ! drukkin
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:kin  # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:nan  # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:kins # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:nir  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:na   # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:kin  # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:na   # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:nari # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:nar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:nar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:kið  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:kið  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:kins # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:kin  # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:kin  # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 :%>n Pos_Def  			;

LEXICON l34_9 ! treffin
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:fin  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:nan  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:fins # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:nir  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:fin  # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:nari # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:fið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:fið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:fins # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:fin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:fin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A:%>n Pos_Def  			;
 
LEXICON l35 ! feingin
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl35 ;
LEXICON zl35 ! feingin
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:eingin  # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:ongnan  # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:ongnum  # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:eingins # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:ongnir  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:ongnar  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:ongnum  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:ongna   # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:eingin  # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:ongna   # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:ongnari # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:ongnar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:ongnar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:ongnar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:ongnum  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:ongna	  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:eingið  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:eingið  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:ongnum  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:eingins # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:eingin  # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:eingin  # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:ongnum  # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:ongna	  # ;
 :ongn 	Pos_Def  			;
 :ongn 	Comp_Ari 		;

LEXICON l35_1 ! teinkin
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:einkin  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:onknan  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:onknum  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:einkins # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:onknir  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:onknar  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:onknum  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:onkna   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:einkin  # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:onkna   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:onknari # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:onknar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:onknar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:onknar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:onknum  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:onkna	  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:einkið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:einkið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:onknum  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:einkins # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:einkin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:einkin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:onknum  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:onkna	  # ;
 +A:onkn 	Pos_Def  			;
 +A:onkn 	Comp_Ari 		;

LEXICON l35_2 ! sleikin
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:eikin  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:oknan  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:oknum  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:eikins # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:oknir  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:oknar  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:oknum  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:okna   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:eikin  # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:okna   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:oknari # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:oknar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:oknar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:oknar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:oknum  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:okna	# ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:eikið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:eikið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:oknum  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:eikins # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:eikin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:eikin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:oknum  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:okna   # ;
 +A:okn 	Pos_Def  			;
 +A:okn 	Comp_Ari 		;

LEXICON l36 ! liðugur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl36 ;
LEXICON zl36 ! liðugur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:ðugur # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:dnan  # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:dnum  # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:ðins  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:dnir  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:dnar  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:dnum  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:dna   # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:ðug   # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:dna   # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:dnari # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:dnar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:dnar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:dnar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:dnum  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:dna   # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:ðugt  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:ðugt  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:dnum  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:ðin   # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:ðug   # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:ðug   # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:dnum  # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:dna   # ;
 :dn 	Pos_Def  		;
 :dn 	Comp_Ari 		;

LEXICON l37 ! grammur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl37 ;
LEXICON zl37 ! grammur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 Sg_Msc1 ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um # ;
 Pl_Msc1 ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um # ;
 Sg_Fem1 ;
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:^UUML%>   # ;
 Pl_Fem1 ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um # ;
 Sg_Neu1 ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um # ;
 Pl_Neu1 ;
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:^UUML%>.  # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:^UUML%>   # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um # ;
 Pos_Def ;
 Comp_Ari ;

LEXICON l39_2/23 ! hættur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 l39_2 	;
 l23 	;
 
LEXICON l39_2 ! finittur = l39, men við stigbending!
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl39_2 		;
LEXICON zl39_2 ! finittur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
  zl39 ;
  Comp_Ari 	;

LEXICON l39 ! settur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl39 	;
LEXICON zl39 ! settur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
  adj_a   	; 
  adj_def 	;

LEXICON l39_3 ! stuttur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: 		zl39_3 		;
LEXICON zl39_3 ! stuttur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
  			zl39			;
  :^IUML 	Comp_Ri 	;

LEXICON l40 ! sannur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl40 ;
LEXICON zl40 ! sannur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>annur	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>annan	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>onnum	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ans	 # ; 
 +Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>annir   # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>annar   # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>onnum   # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>anna    # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>onn     # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>anna    # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>annari  # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>annar   # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>annar   # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>annar   # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>onnum   # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>anna    # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>att     # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>att     # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>onnum   # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ans     # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>onn     # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>onn     # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>onnum   # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>anna    # ;
 :ann 	Pos_Def2  		;
 :ann 	Comp_Ari 		;



!! ## Irregular adjectives

LEXICON STOR
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
        +A:stór   adj_a                 ;
        +A:stór   adj_def               ;
    +A+Comp:størr  indef_cmp_adj_decl    ;
 +A+Superl:størst indef_superl_adj_decl ;

LEXICON andi
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
   +A: HOMONYM_ADJ_FORMS ;
 +Adv: #                 ;

LEXICON HOMONYM_ADJ_FORMS
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc: HOMONYM_ADJ_NUM ;
 +Fem: HOMONYM_ADJ_NUM ;
 +Neu: HOMONYM_ADJ_NUM ;

LEXICON HOMONYM_ADJ_NUM
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Sg: HOMONYM_ADJ_CASE ;
 +Pl: HOMONYM_ADJ_CASE ;

LEXICON HOMONYM_ADJ_CASE
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Nom: HOMONYM_ADJ_DEF ;
 +Acc: HOMONYM_ADJ_DEF ;
 +Gen: HOMONYM_ADJ_DEF ;
 +Dat: HOMONYM_ADJ_DEF ;

LEXICON HOMONYM_ADJ_DEF
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Indef: # ;
   +Def: # ;


!! ###  Irregular comparatives
! =====================

LEXICON indecladj
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A: HOMONYM_ADJ_FORMS ;


LEXICON ELDRI
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A:d CRi ;
 +A:  SRi ;

LEXICON FAERRI
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A:r CRi ;
 +A:g SRi ;

LEXICON FLEIRI
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A:i CRi ;
 +A:  SRi ;

LEXICON STYTTRI
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A:t CRi ;
 +A:  SRi ;
