src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjectives
fáur+A+CmpNP/None:fæ FAERRI ; ! riggar
gamal+A+CmpNP/None:el ELDRI ; ! riggar
mangur+A+CmpNP/None:fle FLEIRI ; ! riggar
stuttur+A+CmpNP/None:styt STYTTRI ; ! riggar
nógvur+A+CmpNP/None:me FLEIRI ; ! riggar ikki
einaráðandi andi ;
heilsufremjandi andi ;
landsfevnandi andi ;
orkukrevjandi andi ;
slóðbrótandi andi ;
viðkonandi andi ;
áleikandi andi ;
ónøktandi andi ;
útistandandi andi ;
ógloymandi andi ;
grátandi andi ;
forloysandi andi ;
sjúkrasystralesandi andi ;
útdoyggjandi andi ;
í-trúgvandi andi ;
valutakrevjandi andi ;
syrgjandi andi ;
røktarkrevjandi andi ;
lívstýðandi andi ;
hjartanemandi andi ;
afturlítandi andi ;
feingin:f l35 ;
liðugur:li l36 ;
grammur:gramm l37 ;
sannur:s l40 ;
altjóða indecladj ; ! Presently no tags.
eyðsæð indecladj ;
alstórur:al STOR ;
beinstórur:bein STOR ;
bjølgstórur:bjølg STOR ;
bollastórur:bolla STOR ;
bulstórur:bul STOR ;
búkstórur:búk STOR ;
framstórur:fram STOR ;
hástórur:há STOR ;
heiðstórur:heið STOR ;
heitstórur:heit STOR ;
hjartastórur:hjarta STOR ;
hugstórur:hug STOR ;
høvuðstórur:høvuð STOR ;
javnstórur:javn STOR ;
knotustórur:knotu STOR ;
kroppstórur:kropp STOR ;
liðastórur:liða STOR ;
limastórur:lima STOR ;
metstórur:met STOR ;
miðjustórur:miðju STOR ;
nevastórur:neva STOR ;
risastórur:risa STOR ;
sjálvstórur:sjálv STOR ;
stakstórur:stak STOR ;
tútastórur:túta STOR ;
vongstórur:vong STOR ;
rættskaffin:rættskaf l34_9 ;
treffin:tref l34_9 ;
ágeingin:á#g l35 ;
einsleingin:ein#sl l35 ;
heitfeingin:heit#f l35 ;
kaldfeingin:kald#f l35 ;
lukkusleingin:lukku#sl l35 ;
ófeingin:ó#f l35 ;
skjótteinkin:skjót#t l35_1 ;
sleikin:sl l35_2 ;
smáfeingin:smá#f l35 ;
smeikin:sm l35_2 ;
stórsleingin:stór#sl l35 ;
viðfeingin:við#f l35 ;
viðgeingin:við#g l35 ;
transvestittur:transvestitt l39 ;
alsettur:al#sett l39 ;
armastuttur:arma#stutt l39_3 ;
armstuttur:arm#stutt l39_3 ;
ástoyttur:á#stoytt l39_2 ;
beinstuttur:bein#stutt l39_3 ;
blálittur:blá#litt l39_2 ;
blóðsettur:blóð#sett l39 ;
bulstuttur:bul#stutt l39_3 ;
burturlýttur:burtur#lýtt l39_2 ;
djevulssettur:djevuls#sett l39_2 ;
døkkleittur:døkk#leitt l39_2 ;
eggjamettur:eggja#mett l39 ;
ermastuttur:erma#stutt l39_3 ;
fagurlittur:fagur#litt l39_2 ;
fjarsettur:fjar#sett l39 ;
fótfittur:fót#fitt l39_2 ;
fýrføttur:fýr#føtt l39_2 ;
giftsettur:gift#sett l39 ;
grønlittur:grøn#litt l39_2 ;
halastuttur:hala#stutt l39_3 ;
hálsstuttur:háls#stutt l39_3 ;
hálvbýttur:hálv#býtt l39_2 ;
hálvmettur:hálv#mett l39 ;
illanssettur:illans#sett l39 ;
illlittur:ill#litt l39_2 ;
kjalstuttur:kjal#stutt l39_3 ;
kjálkalittur:kjálka#litt l39_2 ;
kjálkastuttur:kjálka#stutt l39_3 ;
kjølstuttur:kjøl#stutt l39_3 ;
krikastuttur:krika#stutt l39_3 ;
kvikleittur:kvik#leitt l39_2 ;
leggstuttur:legg#stutt l39_3 ;
ljóslittur:ljós#litt l39_2 ;
lærstuttur:lær#stutt l39_3 ;
lættfloyttur:lætt#floytt l39 ;
miðjustuttur:miðju#stutt l39_3 ;
mislittur:mis#litt l39_2 ;
munnfittur:munn#fitt l39_2 ;
norðstoyttur:norð#stoytt l39 ;
oyrlittur:oyr#litt l39_2 ;
ógittur:ó#gitt l39 ;
óreinsettur:ó#rein#sett l39 ;
ósáttur:ó#sátt l39 ;
purpurlittur:purpur#litt l39_2 ;
rangstoyttur:rang#stoytt l39 ;
reyvarlittur:reyvar#litt l39_2 ;
rúmsáttur:rúm#sátt l39_2 ;
sáttur:sátt l39 ;
skarpleittur:skarp#leitt l39_2 ;
skersettur:sker#sett l39 ;
snáðlittur:snáð#litt l39_2 ;
sneiðursettur:sneiður#sett l39 ;
stuttleittur:stutt#leitt l39_2 ;
stuttur:stutt l39_3 ;
stúttur:stútt l39 ;
títtur:títt l39 ;
trónføttur:trón#føtt l39_2 ;
tungfloyttur:tung#floytt l39 ;
ørbýttur:ør#býtt l39_2 ;
ørstuttur:ør#stutt l39_3 ;
trásettur:trá#sett l39 ;
hálvliðugur:hálv#li l36 ;
óliðugur:ó#li l36 ;
strammur:stramm l37 ;
futtur:futt l39 ;
forvirrandi andi ;
heittur:heitt l39 ;
hittur:hitt l39 ;
hættur:hætt l39_2/23 ;
fullliðugur:full#li l36 ;
fullsettur:full#sett l39 ;
pengagrammur:penga#gramm l37 ;
peningagrammur:peninga#gramm l37 ;
huggrammur:hug#gramm l37 ;
fiskigrammur:fiski#gramm l37 ;
burturtveittur:burtur#tveitt l39 ;
burturbýttur:burtur#býtt l39_2 ;
arbeiðsfremjandi:arbeiðsfremjandi andi ;
inverterandi:inverterandi andi ;
langtíðarfyribyrgjandi:langtíðarfyribyrgjandi andi ;
tileggjandi:tileggjandi andi ;
